Wyoming, session 2026, HB0118.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-101(a)(xvii) by creating a new
subparagraph (C), by renumbering (C) as (D) and by creating
a new paragraph (xix), 39-13-103(b)(iii)(intro), by
HB0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0282
creating a new subparagraph (C) and by renumbering (C) as
(D), 39-15-104 by creating a new subsection (j),
39-15-111(b)(intro) and by creating a new subsection (s),
39-16-104 by creating a new subsection (g) and
39-16-111(b)(intro) are amended to read:

39-11-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act unless otherwise specifically
provided:

(xvii) "Taxable value" means a percent of the
fair market value of property in a particular class as
follows:

(C) Residential real property, zero percent
(0%);

(C)(D) All other property, real and
personal, including property valued and assessed under W.S.
39-13-102(m)(vi) and (ix), nine and one-half percent
(9.5%).

HB0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0282
(xix) "Residential real property" means real
property improved by a dwelling designed to house not more
than three (3) families and includes associated residential
land where the dwelling is located if the land is owned by
the owner of the dwelling. The dwelling may be any type of
residence including a single family home or an individual
condominium unit if the dwelling is used as a primary
residence.

39-13-103. Imposition.

(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

(iii) Beginning January 1, 1989, "Taxable value"
means a percent of the fair market value of property in a
particular class as follows:

(C) Residential real property, zero percent
(0%);

(C)(D) All other property, real and
personal, nine and one-half percent (9.5%).

HB0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0282
39-15-104. Taxation rate.

(j) In addition to the sales tax under subsections
(a) and (b) of this section, beginning April 1, 2027 there
is imposed an additional sales tax as provided in this
subsection. The additional sales tax imposed under this
subsection shall not apply to sales to industrial
facilities as defined by W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii) that are
subject to permitting by the industrial siting council
under W.S. 35-12-101 through 35-12-119 during the period of
permitting and construction of the industrial facility. The
revenue from the tax under this subsection shall be
distributed as provided in W.S. 39-15-111(s). The rate of
the sales tax under this subsection shall be two percent
(2%), which shall be administered as if the sales tax rate
under subsections (a) and (b) of this section was increased
from four percent (4%) to six percent (6%).

39-15-111. Distribution.

(b) Revenues earned under W.S. 39-15-104 during each
fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that
fiscal year for accounting purposes. Except as otherwise
HB0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0282
provided in subsection subsections (p) and (s) of this
section, for all revenue collected by the department under
W.S. 39-15-104 the department shall:

(s) An amount equal to the tax revenue collected that
is attributable to the tax under W.S. 39-15-104(j) and
39-16-104(g) shall be transferred by the department of
revenue to the property tax reduction and replacement
account, which is hereby created. All funds within the
account shall be invested by the state treasurer as
provided by law and all investment earnings from the
account shall be credited to the account. Funds available
in the account shall be distributed as follows:

(i) Not later than September 1 of each year,
each county assessor shall certify to the department the
amount of tax reduction in the county due to the valuation
of residential real property under W.S.
39-11-101(a)(xvii)(C). The amount of tax reduction shall be
calculated as follows:

HB0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0282
(A) The county assessor shall assess all
residential real property using a taxable value of nine and
one-half percent (9.5%);

(B) The county assessor shall apply any
exemptions applicable to the residential real property
under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xliii), (xliv), (xlv) and (xlvi) to
determine the reduced taxable value of the residential real
property;

(C) The number of mills applicable to the
residential real property shall be applied to the reduced
taxable values determined under subparagraph (B) of this
paragraph to determine the total tax reductions in the
county. The county assessor shall report the tax reduction
determined under this subparagraph to the county treasurer.
Beginning January 1, 2028, the amount calculated under this
subparagraph shall not include any amount for mills that
are assessed for the repayment of bonds.

(ii) The tax reductions reported under paragraph
(i) of this subsection shall be used by the department of
revenue to distribute an amount determined under this
HB0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0282
paragraph to each county, to be distributed by county
treasurers in the same manner property taxes are
distributed as provided in W.S. 39-13-111(a)(i). If the
amount available to distribute under this subsection is
insufficient to fully reimburse each county and
governmental entity in the county for tax reductions
reported under paragraph (i) of this subsection, the amount
provided to each county shall be proportionally reduced
based on the total tax reductions reported and the amount
of revenue available. The amount calculated for each county
shall be determined and distributed not later than February
15 of each year based on the amount of revenue that the
county and each governmental entity within the county lost
in the immediately preceding year;

(iii) Any amount remaining after the
distributions in paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall
remain in the property tax reduction and replacement
account. The legislature shall annually review the amounts
in the account and shall consider using any funds in the
account for direct distributions to local governments.

39-16-104. Taxation rate.
HB0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0282

(g) In addition to the use tax under subsections (a)
and (b) of this section, beginning April 1, 2027 there is
imposed an additional use tax as provided in this
subsection. The additional use tax imposed under this
subsection shall not apply to purchases by industrial
facilities as defined by W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii) that are
subject to permitting by the industrial siting council
under W.S. 35-12-101 through 35-12-119 during the period of
permitting and construction of the industrial facility. The
revenue from the tax under this subsection shall be
distributed as provided in W.S. 39-15-111(s). The rate of
the use tax under this subsection shall be two percent
(2%), which shall be administered as if the use tax rate
under subsections (a) and (b) of this section was increased
from four percent (4%) to six percent (6%).

39-16-111. Distribution.

(b) Revenues earned under this article during each
fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that
fiscal year for accounting purposes. Except as provided in
W.S. 39-15-111(s) for revenue attributable to the tax under
HB0118

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0282
W.S. 39-16-104(g), revenue collected by the department from
the taxes imposed by this article shall be transferred to
the state treasurer who shall, as specified by the
department:

Section 2. This act shall be effective only upon
certification by the secretary of state that the electors
have adopted the amendment to the Wyoming Constitution at
the 2026 general election as provided in 2026 Senate Joint
Resolution 0003.

Section 3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(b) Subject to section 2 of this act, section 1 of
this act is effective January 1, 2027.

(END)
HB0118